Hawaii statutes.
§449-12 Errors and omissions
insurance or other security devices. [See Note below.] A
licensed escrow depository shall at all times either:

(1) Maintain a policy of errors and omissions
insurance executed by an insurer authorized to do business in the State in an
amount not less than $250,000; provided that any policy which is subject to a
deductible thereunder in excess of $100,000, per occurrence, shall require the
prior approval of the commissioner, who may take into consideration, among
other factors, the amount of the proposed coverage; or

(2) Deposit an equivalent amount of cash or other
security device under such terms and conditions as are acceptable to the
commissioner. [L 1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-12; am L 1970, c 72, §3; am L
1985, c 269, §50; am L 1992, c 205, §12; am L 1996, c 41, §2; am L 2013, c 166,
§8]

Note

The 2013 amendment, with respect to licensees in operation on
June 21, 2013, shall take effect on the date of the renewal of the security
device, but not later than July 1, 2014. L 2013, c 166, §11.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next